cs: Schopnost satelitního zasílání zpráv: Jednosměrné zprávy; Obousměrné zprávy; Jiné
es: Capacidad de mensajería satelital: Mensajería unidireccional; Mensajería bidireccional; Otros
vi: Khả năng nhắn tin vệ tinh: Nhắn tin một chiều; Nhắn tin hai chiều; Khác
th: ความสามารถในการส่งข้อความผ่านดาวเทียม: ส่งข้อความทางเดียว; ส่งข้อความสองทาง; อื่นๆ
nl: Satellietberichten mogelijkheid: Eenrichtingsberichten; Tweerichtingsberichten; Andere
zh-CN: 卫星消息功能: 单向消息; 双向消息; 其他
ja: 衛星メッセージング機能: 一方向メッセージング; 双方向メッセージング; その他
da: Satellitbeskedkapacitet: Envejsbesked; Tovejsbesked; Andet
hu: Műholdas üzenetküldési képesség: Egyirányú üzenetküldés; Kétirányú üzenetküldés; Egyéb
el: Δυνατότητα δορυφορικών μηνυμάτων: Μηνύματα μονής κατεύθυνσης; Μηνύματα διπλής κατεύθυνσης; Άλλο
nb: Satellittmeldings evne: Enveismeldinger; Toveismeldinger; Annet
sv: Satellitmeddelandekapacitet: Envägskommunikation; Tvåvägskommunikation; Övrigt
de: Satelliten-Nachrichtenfähigkeit: Einweg-Nachrichten; Zweiweg-Nachrichten; Sonstiges
tr: Uydu mesajlaşma kapasitesi: Tek yönlü mesajlaşma; Çift yönlü mesajlaşma; Diğer
en: Satellite messaging capability: One-way messaging; Two-way messaging; Other
ru: Возможность спутниковой связи: Односторонние сообщения; Двусторонние сообщения; Другой
sk-SK: Možnosť satelitných správ: Jednosmerné správy; Obojsmerné správy; Iné
pt-BR: Capacidade de mensagem via satélite: Mensagem unidirecional; Mensagem bidirecional; Outro
hr-HR: Mogućnost satelitskog slanja poruka: Jednosmjerno slanje poruka; Dvosmjerno slanje poruka; Ostalo
it: Capacità di messaggistica satellitare: Messaggistica unidirezionale; Messaggistica bidirezionale; Altro
sl-SI: Zmožnost satelitskega sporočanja: Enosmerno sporočanje; Dvosmerno sporočanje; Drugo
ro-RO: Capacitate de mesagerie satelit: Mesagerie unidirecțională; Mesagerie bidirecțională; Altele
pl: Możliwość przesyłania wiadomości satelitarnych: Wiadomości jednokierunkowe; Wiadomości dwukierunkowe; Inne
lt-LT: Palydovinio pranešimų siuntimo galimybė: Vienkryptis pranešimas; Dvikryptis pranešimas; Kita
bg-BG: Възможност за сателитни съобщения: Едностранни съобщения; Двустранни съобщения; Други
ko: 위성 메시징 기능: 단방향 메시징; 양방향 메시징; 기타
fr: Capacité de messagerie satellite: Messagerie unidirectionnelle; Messagerie bidirectionnelle; Autre
pt-PT: Capacidade de mensagem via satélite: Mensagens unidirecionais; Mensagens bidirecionais; Outro
zh-TW: 衛星傳訊功能: 單向訊息; 雙向訊息; 其他
fi: Satelliittiviestintäkyky: Yksisuuntainen viestintä; Kaksisuuntainen viestintä; Muu